azg.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<clf%>		     ! Clasificador
%<sg%>		     ! Singular
%<pl%>		     ! Plural

%{n%}
%{i%}


%>

LEXICON Root
ki%<clf%>:ki Plur-n ; ! "animal"
             Plur-ki ; 

LEXICON Stem

sna%<n%>:sna # ; ! "coa"
ston%<n%>:ston # ; ! "caja"
sto%<n%>:sto # ; ! "pastor"
sno%<n%>:sno # ; ! "burro"
stho%<n%>:stho # ; ! "canoa"
su%<n%>:su # ; ! "llano"
xu%<n%>:xu # ; ! "carga"
së%<n%>:së # ; ! "manojo"
sa%<n%>:sa # ; ! "cicatriz"

LEXICON Stem2
tsue%<n%>:tsue #; ! "perro"
tshon%<n%>:tshon #; !"gallina"
tson%<n%>:tson #; ! "lagarto"
tsku%<n%>:tsku #; ! "avispa"
tsë%<n%>:tsë #; ! "mariposa"
chi%<n%>:chi #; ! "abeja"
chon%<n%>:chon #; ! "mosca"
së%<n%>:së #; ! "sapo"
xe'%<n%>:xe' #; ! "cotorro"
chi'%<n%>:chi' #; ! "ratón"
tsa'%<n%>:tsa' #; ! "tejón"
s'ohnë%<n%>:s'ohnë #; ! "venado"
ndiu%<n%>:ndiu #; !"gorgojo"
s'ondë%<n%>:s'ondë #; !"vaca"


LEXICON Plur-n

%<pl%>:%{n%}%> Stem2 ; ! ""

LEXICON Plur-ki 
%<pl%>:k%{i%}%> Stem ; ! ""
